Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-15,212
Nebraska Emergency Management Agency; duties; emergency planning districts.

(1) The Nebraska Emergency Management Agency shall:

(a) Appoint local emergency planning committees pursuant to section 81-15,215; and

(b) Supervise and coordinate the activities of the local emergency planning committees.

(2) The Nebraska Emergency Management Agency shall designate each county or, where appropriate, multiple counties as emergency planning districts in order to facilitate preparation and implementation of emergency plans.

Laws 1997, LB 374, § 22;

Laws 2026, LB905, § 47.
July 1, 2026